Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8115.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-56-10 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-56 entitled "Corrections
Department" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-56-10. Powers of the director.
In addition to exercising the powers and performing the duties, which are otherwise given
to the director by law, the director of the department of corrections shall:
(1) Designate, establish, maintain, and administer those state correctional facilities that the
director deems necessary, and may discontinue the use of those state correctional facilities that the
director deems appropriate for that action;
(2) Maintain security, safety, and order at all state correctional facilities, utilize the
resources of the department to prevent escapes from any state correctional facility, take all
necessary precautions to prevent the occurrence or spread of any disorder, riot, or insurrection of
any state correctional facility, including, but not limited to, the development, planning, and
coordination of emergency riot procedures, and take suitable measures for the restoration of order;
(3) Establish and enforce standards for all state correctional facilities;
(4) Supervise and/or approve the administration by the assistant directors of the
department;
(5) Manage, direct, and supervise the operations of the department;
(6) Direct employees in the performance of their official duties;
(7) Hire, promote, transfer, assign, and retain employees and suspend, demote, discharge,

or take other necessary disciplinary action;
(8) Maintain the efficiency of the operations of the department;
(9) Determine the methods, means, and personnel by which those operations of the
department are to be conducted;
(10) Relieve employees from duties because of lack of work or for other legitimate reasons;
(11) Establish, maintain, and administer programs, including, but not limited to, education,
training, and employment, of persons committed to the custody of the department, designed as far
as practicable to prepare and assist each person to assume the responsibilities and exercise the rights
of a citizen of this state;
(12) Establish a system of classification of persons committed to the custody of the
department for the purpose of developing programs for each person. In order to effectively develop
an individualized program for each sentenced inmate that will address each offender’s individual
treatment and rehabilitative needs, the department of corrections is authorized to receive, with the
express consent of the inmate, and upon request to the department of children, youth and families,
the offender’s juvenile arrest and/or adjudication records. Information related to the juvenile’s
family members and other third parties, excluding law enforcement personnel, shall be redacted
from the records provided prior to their release to the department. The records will be disclosed to
only those department personnel directly responsible for, and only for the purpose of, developing
the individualized program for the offender;
(13) Determine at the time of commitment, and from time to time thereafter, the custody
requirements and program needs of each person committed to the custody of the department and
assign or transfer those persons to appropriate facilities and programs;
(14) Establish training programs for employees of the department, including the use of an
application system for the department’s correctional officer training academy that leverages other
law enforcement entity recruiting and the establishment of any fee associated with such system,
provided that a state application process compliant with § 28-6.3-1 also be provided;
(15) Investigate grievances and inquire into alleged misconduct within the department;
(16) Maintain adequate records of persons committed to the custody of the department;
(17) Establish and maintain programs of research, statistics, and planning, and conduct
studies relating to correctional programs and responsibilities of the department;
(18) Utilize, as far as practicable, the services and resources of specialized community
agencies and other local community groups in the development of programs, recruitment of
volunteers, and dissemination of information regarding the work and needs of the department;
(19) Make and enter into any contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the
LC005683 - Page 2 of 5

performance of the duties and execution of the powers of the department, including, but not limited
to, contracts to render services to committed offenders, and to provide for training or education for
correctional officers and staff;
(20) Seek to develop civic interest in the work of the department and educate the public to
the needs and goals of the corrections process;
(21) Expend annually in the exercise of the director’s powers, performance of the director’s
duties, and for the necessary operations of the department those sums that may be appropriated by
the general assembly;
(22) Make and promulgate necessary rules and regulations incident to the exercise of the
director’s powers and the performance of the director’s duties, including, but not limited to, rules
and regulations regarding nutrition, sanitation, safety, discipline, recreation, religious services,
communication, and visiting privileges, classification, education, training, employment, care, and
custody for all persons committed to correctional facilities;
(23) Make and promulgate regulations to provide:
(i) Written notice to licensed nursing facilities, licensed assisted-living residences, and
housing for the elderly whenever a person seeking to reside in one of these facilities or residences
is being released on parole for any of the following offenses: murder, voluntary manslaughter,
involuntary manslaughter, first-degree sexual assault, second-degree sexual assault, third-degree
sexual assault, assault on persons sixty (60) years of age or older, assault with intent to commit
specified felonies (murder, robbery, rape, or burglary), felony assault, patient abuse, neglect or
mistreatment of patients, burglary, first degree arson, felony larceny, or robbery;
(ii) A risk assessment process to identify and recommend safety or security measures
necessary for the protection of other residents or clients, including whether the parolee should be
prohibited from residing in any such facility or residence or segregated from other residents or
clients to protect the security and safety of other residents;
(iii) The written notice to licensed nursing facilities, assisted living residences, or housing
for the elderly shall include charge information and disposition about the offense for which the
resident or client has been paroled, contact information for the resident’s or client’s parole
supervisor, a copy of the risk assessment and recommendations, if any, regarding safety and
security measures. A copy of the written notice shall be provided to the parolee; and
(iv) A process for notifying the appropriate state regulatory agency and the state long-term
care ombudsman whenever notice as required in subsection (23)(i) of this section has been given;
(24) Notwithstanding the enumeration of the powers of the director as set forth in this
section, and notwithstanding any other provision of the general laws, the validity and enforceability
LC005683 - Page 3 of 5

of the provisions of a collective bargaining agreement shall not be contested, affected, or
diminished, nor shall any arbitration award be vacated, remanded or set aside on the basis of an
alleged conflict with this section or with any other provision of the general laws.
No later than January 1, 2027, the director shall develop written policies and procedures
for the use of body cameras by correctional officers. The purpose of said policies and procedures
shall be the creation of a complete record of critical incidents deemed worthy of recording and the
enhancement of safety of correctional officers, staff, and inmates. In creating said policies and
procedures, the director shall consult with community members and groups representing the
incarcerated population; the attorney general; the Rhode Island police chiefs association; the public
defender for the Rhode Island office of the public defender; the brotherhood of correctional
officers; the American Civil Liberties Union (“ACLU”) of Rhode Island; and experts in the
development of correctional policy. At a minimum, the policies and procedures shall contain the
following:
(i) Definitions and examples of "critical instances" when body cameras should be activated
by the correctional officer;
(ii) The creation of a complete and accurate record of the critical incident being recorded;
(iii) Storage of recordings and access to them by courts or in internal disciplinary
proceedings;
(iv) Recognizing that Rhode Island is a "One Party Consent" state, whether or not notice
should be given to those subject to being recorded;
(v) Retention and destruction of recordings; and
(vi) Training for correctional officers and staff in the use of body cameras; and
(25) Notwithstanding the enumeration of the powers of the director as set forth in this
section, and notwithstanding any other provision of the general laws, the validity and enforceability
of the provisions of a collective bargaining agreement shall not be contested, affected, or
diminished, nor shall any arbitration award be vacated, remanded or set aside on the basis of an
alleged conflict with this section or with any other provision of the general laws.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005683
========
LC005683 - Page 4 of 5